Utah statutes.
7-1-204.   Chief examiner -- Powers and duties.
(1)  The commissioner shall designate an examiner as chief examiner, who shall
be  sufficiently qualified by training and experience in financial
institutions or as an employee of a state or federal agency having supervision
of financial institutions to perform the duties of the office.
(2)  The chief examiner shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. If
the office of commissioner is vacant, or in the absence, recusal, or
disability of the commissioner, the chief examiner shall exercise all of the
powers of the commissioner, except those powers the commissioner otherwise
delegates or reserves during a period of absence or recusal. The chief
examiner shall assist, advise, and perform administrative duties as directed
by the commissioner and may also act as a supervisor.
